Washington statutes.
RCW 36.80.040

Records to be kept.

The office of county engineer shall be an office of record. The county road engineer shall: Record and has authority over all matters concerning the public roads, highways, bridges, ditches, or other surveys of the county, with the original papers, documents, petitions, surveys, repairs, and other papers, in order to have the complete history of any such road, highway, bridge, ditch, or other survey; and number each construction or improvement project. Records related to roads or rights-of-way annexed or transferred to other jurisdictions may be transferred to those jurisdictions. Records related to transitory or maintenance activities shall be kept according to record retention schedules. The county engineer is not required to retain and file financial documents retained and filed in other departments in the county.

[ 2016 c 19 s 5; 1995 c 194 s 8; 1969 ex.s. c 182 s 9; 1963 c 4 s 36.80.040. Prior: 1907 c 160 s 4; RRS s 4147.]

NOTES:

Intent—2016 c 19: See note following RCW 36.87.120.